Colorado, session 2025B, SB25B-007.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-1203, amend
(12) as follows:
10-16-1203. Definitions. As used in this part 12, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(12) (a) "Qualified individual" means an individual regardless of
immigration status, who:
(a) (I) Is a Colorado resident;
-2- SB25B-007

(b) (II) Has a household income of not more than three hundred
percent of the federal poverty line; and
(c) (III) Is not eligible for the premium tax credit, medicaid,
medicare, or the children's basic health plan. except for individuals
eligible pursuant to section 25.5-5-201 (6) or section 25.5-8-109 (7).
(b) "QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL" DOES NOT INCLUDE A PERSON WHO
IS NOT A CITIZEN OR NATIONAL OF THE UNITED STATES OR WHO IS NOT
LAWFULLY RESIDING AS DEFINED IN SECTION 25.5-4-103.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-109, repeal
(1)(a.7) and (1)(a.8) as follows:
24-75-109. Controller may allow expenditures in excess of
appropriations - limitations - appropriations for subsequent fiscal
year restricted - repeal. (1) For the purpose of closing the state's books,
and subject to the provisions of this section, the controller may, on or
after May 1 of any fiscal year and before the forty-fifth day after the close
thereof, upon approval of the governor, allow any department, institution,
or agency of the state, including any institution of higher education, to
make an expenditure in excess of the amount authorized by an item of
appropriation for such fiscal year if:
(a.7) The overexpenditure is by the department of health care
policy and financing for the state medical assistance program, established
pursuant to section 25.5-2-104; or
(a.8) The overexpenditure is by the department of health care
policy and financing for the state children's basic health plan, established
pursuant to section 25.5-2-105; or
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-1-201, repeal
(1)(f.5) as follows:
-3- SB25B-007

25.5-1-201. Programs to be administered by the department
of health care policy and financing. (1) The state department shall
administer the following programs and perform the following functions:
(f.5) The reproductive health-care program that provides
reproductive health-care services, as specified in section 25.5-2-103;
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 25.5-2-103,
25.5-2-104, and 25.5-2-105.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-201, amend
(1) as follows:
25.5-4-201. Cash system of accounting - financial
administration of medical services premiums - medical programs
administered by department of human services - federal
contributions - rules. (1) The state department shall utilize the cash
system of accounting, as enunciated by the governmental accounting
standards board, regardless of the source of revenues involved, for all
activities of the state department relating to the financial administration
of any nonadministrative expenditure that qualifies for federal financial
participation under Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", and for
the administration of the state-funded health and medical care program,
created pursuant to section 25.5-2-104, and for the state children's basic
health plan, created pursuant to section 25.5-2-105, except for
expenditures under the program for the medically indigent, article 3 of
this title 25.5.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-503, amend
(2) as follows:
25.5-4-503. Waiver applications - authorization. (2) The state
department shall pursue and, if approved, implement a demonstration
-4- SB25B-007

waiver that authorizes the state to use federal medical assistance
payments authorized pursuant to section 1903(v) of the federal "Social
Security Act", as amended, in coordination with the division of insurance
to enhance or expand a state-subsidized individual health coverage plan
as defined in section 10-16-1203 (15). and, only if needed to maximize
federal financial participation, for Coloradans receiving state medical
assistance pursuant to section 25.5-2-104 or 25.5-5-201 (6). To the extent
such THE federal funds are used to enhance or expand a state-subsidized
individual health coverage plan, as defined in section 10-16-1203 (15),
the health insurance affordability enterprise created pursuant to section
10-16-1204 must receive, deposit into the health insurance affordability
cash fund created in section 10-16-1206, and allocate the federal share of
the medical assistance payments pursuant to section 10-16-1205 (2),
subject to any conditions set forth in the approval of the waiver.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-103, amend
(3)(a) as follows:
25.5-5-103. Mandated programs with special state provisions
- rules. (3) (a) Emergency medical assistance shall MUST be provided to
any person who is not a citizen of the United States, including
undocumented aliens, aliens who are not qualified aliens, and qualified
aliens who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, who has
A QUALIFIED ALIEN WITH an emergency medical condition and meets one
of the categorical requirements set forth in section 25.5-5-101. except that
such persons shall not be required to meet any residency requirement
other than that required by federal law.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-5-103.5 as
follows:
-5- SB25B-007

25.5-5-103.5. Prohibition on reimbursement for medical
services to a person who is not lawfully residing. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED
IN SECTION 25.5-5-103 AND NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW TO THE
CONTRARY, THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT REIMBURSE A
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER, ENTITY, OR FACILITY FOR PROVIDING MEDICAL
SERVICES TO A PERSON UNLESS THE PERSON IS A CITIZEN OR NATIONAL OF
THE UNITED STATES OR IS LAWFULLY RESIDING AS DEFINED IN SECTION
25.5-4-103.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-201, repeal
(6) as follows:
25.5-5-201. Optional provisions - optional groups - rules.
(6) (a) Beginning no later than January 1, 2025, a pregnant person who
is not a citizen and who is not eligible for medical assistance pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section is eligible to receive medical assistance
pursuant to this subsection (6)(a) if the individual meets the eligibility
requirements other than those related to citizenship and immigration
status.
(b) A pregnant person who is eligible for medical assistance
pursuant to this subsection (6) remains continuously eligible for all
medical services pursuant to the medical assistance program for the
twelve-month postpartum period, so long as eligibility remains in effect
pursuant to subsection (4.5)(a) of this section.
(c) The state department shall seek any necessary federal
approvals to maximize any available federal financial participation in
implementing this subsection (6). Benefits for services obtained pursuant
to this subsection (6) must be provided with only state funds if federal
financial participation is unavailable for such services.
-6- SB25B-007

(d) (I) During its 2024 presentation to the joint budget committee
of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health and human
services committee of the senate and the health and insurance committee
of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, at the
hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement
for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government
Act", the state department shall report on its plans and progress in
implementing the coverage expansion created pursuant to this subsection
(6).
(II) Beginning January 1, 2026, and continuing every January
thereafter, the state department, in its presentation to the joint budget
committee of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health
and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance
committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees,
at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State
Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART)
Government Act", shall report on the cost savings and health
improvements associated with the coverage expansion created pursuant
to this subsection (6).
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-204, amend
(2)(a) and (2.5) as follows:
25.5-5-204. Presumptive eligibility - pregnant person -
children - long-term care - state plan. (2) (a) A pregnant person is
presumptively eligible for the medical assistance program and shall
receive services specified by federal law only if the person declares all
pertinent information relating to the criteria of income, assets, and only
if necessary to administer reimbursement for services, status.
-7- SB25B-007

(2.5) A child less than WHO IS UNDER nineteen years of age is
presumptively eligible for the medical assistance program and shall
receive services specified by federal law only if a parent or legal guardian
of the child declares all pertinent information relating to the criteria of
income, assets, and only if necessary to administer reimbursement for
services, status of the child's family.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-335, amend
(2)(a), (2)(b), and (7)(b) as follows:
25.5-5-335. Continuous medical coverage for children and
adults feasibility study - federal authorization - rules - report -
definition. (2) At a minimum, the feasibility study must consider the
costs; implementation factors, including county workload, training, and
administrative burdens on the counties, information technology systems,
upgrades, and associated costs; potential health benefits for individuals
and communities, including disadvantaged and marginalized groups;
impacts of increased use of preventive and high-value health services;
administrative savings, including, but not limited to, reducing or
eliminating eligibility processing for populations during the continuous
eligibility period; reductions in administrative turnover and coverage loss;
and, to the extent practicable, social and economic impacts with respect
to the following:
(a) Allowing an eligible child, as defined in this article 5 and
articles 2, 3, 6, and 8 of this title 25.5, including children eligible under
sections 25.5-2-104 and 25.5-2-105, to remain continuously eligible for
medical assistance and the children's basic health plan for twenty-four
months after the last day of the month in which the child was enrolled;
(b) Allowing an eligible child, as defined in this article 5 and
-8- SB25B-007

articles 2, 3, 6, and 8 of this title 25.5, including children eligible under
sections 25.5-2-104 and 25.5-2-105 who are less than WHO IS UNDER six
years of age, to remain continuously eligible for medical assistance or the
children's basic health plan without regard to a change in household
income until the child reaches six years of age;
(7) (b) For purposes of seeking federal authorization pursuant to
subsection (7)(a) of this section, an eligible child is as defined in this
article 5 and articles 2, 3, 6, and 8 of this title 25.5 including a child
eligible pursuant to sections 25.5-2-104 and 25.5-2-105, and must be
under three years of age. An eligible child shall remain continuously
eligible without regard to household income until the eligible child
reaches three years of age; except that a child is no longer eligible and
must be disenrolled from a medical assistance program if the state
department becomes aware that the child has moved out of the state, the
state department or county possesses facts indicating that the family has
requested the child's voluntary disenrollment, the state department
determines eligibility was erroneously granted, or the child is deceased.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-8-103, amend
(4)(a)(I) and (4)(b)(I) as follows:
25.5-8-103. Definitions - rules. As used in this article 8, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(4) "Eligible person" means:
(a) (I) A person who is less than UNDER nineteen years of age,
who is a citizen or meets the immigration status requirements set forth in
section 25.5-8-109 (6) or 25.5-8-109 (7), whose family income does not
exceed two hundred sixty percent of the federal poverty line, adjusted for
family size, and who is not eligible for medical assistance pursuant to
-9- SB25B-007

articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title 25.5.
(b) (I) A pregnant person who is a citizen or meets the
immigration status requirements set forth in section 25.5-8-109 (6) or
25.5-8-109 (7), whose family income does not exceed two hundred sixty
percent of the federal poverty line, adjusted for family size, and who is
not eligible for medical assistance pursuant to articles 4, 5, and 6 of this
title 25.5.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-8-107, repeal
(1)(i) as follows:
25.5-8-107. Duties of the department - schedule of services -
premiums - copayments - subsidies - purchase of childhood
immunizations. (1) In addition to any other duties pursuant to this article
8, the department has the following duties:
(i) (I) The department shall develop and implement an outreach
strategy for Coloradans who become eligible for health coverage pursuant
to section 25.5-2-104, 25.5-2-105, 25.5-5-201 (6), or 25.5-8-109 (7). The
state department shall work with stakeholders to develop an outreach
strategy that includes:
(A) Funding for community-based organizations to partner with
the department on outreach;
(B) A method for providing information related to eligibility and
enrollment that can be provided to nonprofit partners, school districts, and
charter schools for outreach purposes; and
(C) At a minimum, providing information related to eligibility and
coverage in English, Spanish, and in each language spoken by at least
two-and-one-half percent of the population of any county who speak
English less than very well, as defined by the United States bureau of the
-10- SB25B-007

census American community survey, and who speak the minority
language at home;
(II) Approximately twelve and twenty-four months after
implementation of the strategy required pursuant to subsection (1)(i)(I) of
this section, the department shall convene stakeholders, including directly
impacted individuals, service providers, and advocacy organizations that
are diverse with regard to race, ethnicity, immigration status, sexual
orientation, and gender identity and who are affected by higher rates of
health disparities and inequities. The department shall report on the
outreach and enrollment strategy outcomes, including enrollment of
eligible persons into these programs compared to those persons who are
eligible for coverage, but not enrolled.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-8-109,repeal
(7) as follows:
25.5-8-109. Eligibility - children - pregnant women - rules.
(7) (a) Beginning no later than January 1, 2025, notwithstanding any
other provision of law, the department shall provide benefits pursuant to
this article 8 to a pregnant person who is not a citizen and is not eligible
pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, so long as the pregnant person
meets the eligibility criteria other than those related to citizenship or
immigration status. Eligibility pursuant to this section extends
continuously through the twelve-month postpartum period, so long as
eligibility remains in effect pursuant to subsection (5.5)(a) of this section.
(b) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to
maximize any available federal financial participation in implementing
this subsection (7).
(c) (I) During its 2024 presentation to the joint budget committee
-11- SB25B-007

of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health and human
services committee of the senate and the health and insurance committee
of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, at the
hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement
for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government
Act", the state department shall report on its plans and progress in
implementing the coverage expansion created pursuant to this subsection
(7).
(II) Beginning January 1, 2026, and continuing every January
thereafter, the state department, in its presentation to the joint budget
committee of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health
and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance
committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees,
at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State
Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART)
Government Act", shall report on the cost savings and health
improvements associated with the coverage expansion created pursuant
to this subsection (7).
(d) This subsection (7) constitutes state authority within the
meaning of 8 U.S.C. sec. 1621 (d), as that law existed on January 1, 2022.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-8-109.3,
repeal (1) and (3)(a) as follows:
25.5-8-109.3. Health services initiatives. (1) To the extent
federal financial participation is available, the department shall design
and implement health service initiatives pursuant to section
2105(a)(1)(D)(ii) of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, to
provide funding for continuous enrollment for the twelve-month
-12- SB25B-007

postpartum period for a person who is enrolled in health-care coverage
pursuant to section 25.5-5-201 (6) or 25.5-8-109 (7).
(3) (a) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals
to obtain federal financial participation in implementing subsection (1) of
this section.
SECTION 16. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly; except
that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V
of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this
act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take
effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-13- SB25B-007